Wisconsin, session 2025, AB271.
do enact as follows:AB271,1Section 1. 347.40 (4) of the statutes is created to read:347.40 (4) Notwithstanding sub. (1) and 49 CFR 393.80 (a), a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in 49 CFR 390.5, may be equipped with a camera monitor system that is exempted from the requirements of 49 CFR 393.80 (a) by the federal motor carrier safety administration or approved for use under 49 CFR 393.80 or in federal motor vehicle safety standards as an alternative to mirrors. In this subsection, “commercial motor vehicle” includes a commercial motor vehicle operated in intrastate commerce. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab271 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab271 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB271 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB271 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB271: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting